Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-148.08
Bank subsidiary corporation; examination and regulation.

A bank subsidiary corporation is subject to examination and regulation by the department to the same extent as its bank shareholder or shareholders.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 50.